Mississippi, session 2026, SB2597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to transfer to the Madison County Economic Development Authority, certain real property located at 1286 Gluckstadt Road, Madison, Mississippi, commonly known as the ABC Warehouse, together with any improvements located thereon and any property related thereto. (2)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall obtain a legal description of the property prior to conveyance, and such legal description shall be included in the deed or other instrument of conveyance. (3)  The transfer and conveyance authorized in subsection (1) of this section may be made at a public or private sale, for cash or upon such other terms and conditions as the Department of Finance and Administration may deem appropriate and in the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  The department is authorized to advertise the sale in such manner as it determines appropriate and may determine the manner and timing of the sale. (4)  The property shall be sold for not less than fair market value as determined by two (2) professional, certified general appraisers selected by the Department of Finance and Administration according to Section 29-1-1. (5)  The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to execute and deliver, in the name of and on behalf of the State of Mississippi, any deeds, bills of sale or other instruments necessary to convey the property. (6)  The State of Mississippi shall retain all mineral rights to the real property transferred under this section. (7)  The Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to correct any discrepancies in the legal description of the property provided in this section. (8)  The proceeds derived from the sale of the real property and improvements under this act, after the deduction of reasonable costs and expenses incurred in connection with the sale, shall be deposited into the State General Fund. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage, and shall stand repealed on the day before its passage.